en: fuki
la: Petasites japonicus

en: mustard cabbage, gai choy, Chinese mustard
la: Brassica juncea

en: red cabbage
bg: червено зеле
bn: লাল বাঁধাকপি
br: kaol ruz
ca: col llombarda
cs: červené zelí
da: rødkål
de: rotkohl, Rotkraut
el: κόκκινο λάχανο
eo: ruĝa brasiko
es: cacho lombarda, col lombarda
fa: کلم‌قرمز
fi: punakaali
fr: chou rouge
ga: cabáiste dearg
gl: lombarda
he: כרוב אדום
hi: लाल पत्ता गोभी
hr: crveni kupus
hu: vörös káposzta
hy: կարմիր կաղամբ
id: kol merah
is: rauðkál
it: cavolo rosso
ja: 赤キャベツ, 紫キャベツ, レッドキャベツ
ka: წითელი კომბოსტო
ko: 적채
lg: emboga
lv: sarkanais galviņkāposts
mk: црвена зелка
ml: ചുവന്ന കാബേജ്
ms: kubis merah
nb: rødkål
ne: रातो गोभी
nl: rode kool, rodekool
pl: czerwona kapusta, kapusta czerwona
pt: couve-roxa
ro: varză roșie
sk: červená kapusta
sq: lakër e kuqe
sv: rödkål
th: กะหล่ำปลีม่วง
tr: kırmızı lahana
uk: капуста червоноголова
zh: 紫甘藍

en: heart of palm, Hearts of palm, palm heart
ar: جمار
de: Palmherzen, Palmherz
eo: Palmomedolo
es: palmito, corazón de palmito, corazones de palmito
fa: پنیر نخل
fi: Palmun sydän
fr: Cœur de palmier, cœurs de palmiers, cœurs de palmier, coeur de palmier, coeurs de palmiers, coeurs de palmier, choux palmistes, chou palmiste
gl: Palmito
gv: Cabbash phalm
he: לבבות דקל
hr: srce dlana
it: palmito, cuore di palma, cuori di palma
ja: ハート・オブ・パーム
jv: Pondhoh
la: Cerebrum palmae
lt: Palmės šerdis
nl: Palmharten
pl: serce palmy, serca palmy
pt: palmito, coração de palmeira
ru: Сердцевина пальмы
sv: Palmhjärta
tl: Ubod

en: onion-family vegetable
fr: légume de la famille de l'oignon
lv: Sīpolu dzimtas dārzenis
nl: uienfamilie groenten

en: onion, onions
ar: بصل
bg: лук, кромид лук
bn: পিঁয়াজ
ca: ceba
cs: cibule
cy: Nionyn
da: løg
de: Zwiebel, Zwiebeln, Speisezwiebel
el: κρεμμύδι, κρεμμύδια
eo: cepo
es: cebolla, Cebollas
et: sibul
eu: tipula
fi: sipuli, sipulit
fr: oignon, oignons
he: בצל
hr: luk, crni luk
hu: hagyma, hagymák, vöröshagyma
io: Onyono
is: laukur
it: cipolla, Cipolle
ja: タマネギ, オニオン, たまねぎ, 玉葱, 玉ねぎ
lt: svogūnai
lv: sīpoli
nb: løk, løker
nl: ui, uien, ajuin
nn: lauk, laukar, løk, løkar
nv: tłʼohchin
pl: cebula, cebuli, cebulowy, cebulowa, cebulowe, cebulka, cebulki
pt: cebola
ro: ceapă, ceapa
ru: лук, лук репчатый
sv: lök, lökar
tr: soğan
uk: Цибуля
vi: hành tây
zh: 洋葱

en: onion paster
cs: cibulová pasta, cibulový protlak
hr: pasta od luka
it: condimento alla cipolla

en: onion oil
de: Zwiebelöl
es: aceite de cebolla
hr: ulje od luka
it: olio di cipolla

en: spring onion, green onion, scallions, spring onions, green onions
ar: البصل الاخضر
bg: преснен лук, зелен лук
ca: ceba tendra, cebeta, ceballot
cs: jarní cibulka
da: forårsløg
de: Frühlingszwiebel, Frühlingszwiebeln, Lauchzwiebel
el: φρέσκο κρεμμυδακι
eo: askolonio
es: cebolla de primavera, cebolletas tiernas
et: roheline sibul
fa: پیازچه
fi: vihersipuli, vihersipulit
fr: oignon vert, cébette, oignon de printemps, oignons verts, cébettes, oignons de printemps
he: בצל ירוק
hi: हरी प्याज
hr: proljetni luk
hu: zöldhagyma, újhagyma
hy: Կանաչ սոխ
id: daun bawang
is: vorlaukur
it: cipollotto
ja: ワケギ
jv: loncang
kk: жасыл жуа
ko: 파류
mr: कांदेपात
ms: Daun bawang
nl: lente-ui, bosui, Lenteuitjes, lenteui
nn: vårlauk
no: vårløk
pl: cebulka zielona, zielona cebulka, zielonej cebulki
pt: cebolinha
ru: лук зелёный
sk: jarná cibuľka
sv: salladslök, vårlök
ta: வெங்காயத்தாள்
th: หอมต้นเดี่ยว
tr: yeşil soğan
ug: غول پىياز
uk: зелена цибуля
uz: ko'k piyoz
vi: hành lá
zh: 青蔥

en: onion sproute
de: Zwiebelsprosse, Zwiebelsprossen
es: Germinados de cebolla
hr: mladica luka
it: germogli di cipolla

en: small white onions, silverskin onions
de: Silberzwiebeln
eo: peklita cepo
es: Cebollitas
fi: Hillosipuli
fr: oignons blancs, petits oignons blancs, petits oignons
he: בצל כבוש
hr: mali bijeli luk
it: cipolline
nl: zilveruitjes, zilverui
sv: Syltlök

en: red onion, red onions
ar: بصل أحمر
bg: червен лук
bn: লাল পিঁয়াজ
cs: červená cibule
da: rødløg
de: rote Zwiebel, rote Zwiebeln
es: cebolla roja
fa: پیاز قرمز
fi: punasipuli
fr: oignon rouge, oignons rouges
he: בצל סגול
hi: लाल प्याज
hr: crveni luk, luk crveni
hu: lilahagyma
is: rauðlaukur
it: cipolla rossa
ja: 赤たまねぎ
ka: წითელი ხახვი
nb: rødløk
nl: rode ui, rode uien
nn: raudlauk
or: ନାଲି ପିଆଜ
pa: ਲਾਲ ਪਿਆਜ਼
pl: czerwona cebula, cebula czerwona
pt: Cebola vermelha
ro: ceapă roșie
ru: красный лук
sq: qepë e kuqe
sr: crveni luk
sv: rödlök
tr: kırmızı soğan

en: Roscoff onions
de: Roscoff Zwiebeln, Roscoff Zwiebel
fr: oignon de Roscoff, oignons de Roscoff
hr: roscoff luk
it: cipolle di Roscoff
nl: Roscoffui, Roscoff ui

en: Roscoff PDO onions
fr: oignon de Roscoff AOP
hr: roscoff pdo luka
it: cipolla di Roscoff DOP
nl: Roscoffui met BOB-keurmerk

en: Welsh onion, bunching onion, long green onion, Korean leek
be: Цыбуля-батун
bo: ཙོང་།
br: Sivolez
ca: cebollí gallès
cs: cibule zimní
cy: Nionyn Cymreig
da: koreansk porre, koreanske porrer
de: Winterzwiebel
eo: Vintra cepo
es: cebolleta
eu: Tipuleta
fi: Pillisipuli
fr: ciboule
hr: zimski luk
id: Bawang daun
io: Cibolo
it: cipolla d'inverno
ja: ネギ, ねぎ, 葱
jv: Bawang godhong
ka: ჭლაკვი
kk: Батун
ko: 파
la: Allium fistulosum
ln: Ndɛmbi
lt: korėjietiški porai
nb: koreansk purre
nl: stengelui
nn: Pipelauk
oc: Cebola
pl: czosnek dęty
pt: cebolleta
ro: ceapă de tuns
ru: Лук-батун
sl: čebula
sr: аљма
su: Bawang daun
sv: piplök, walesisk lök, koreansk purjolök
te: ఉల్లి కాడలు
tr: Kış soğanı
uk: Батун
uz: Batun piyozi
vi: Hành
za: coeng
zh: 葱

en: yellow onion
bg: жълт лук
de: gelbe Zwiebel, gelbe Zwiebeln
fi: keltasipuli
fr: oignon jaune, oignons jaunes
hr: žuti luk
it: cipolla gialla
nl: Gele ui
sv: gul lök

en: white onion
bg: бял лук
de: weiße Zwiebel, weiße Zwiebeln
es: cebolla blanca
fr: Oignon blanc
hr: bijeli luk
it: cipolla bianca
pl: cebula biała, biała cebula
ro: ceapă albă

en: fresh onions
de: frische Zwiebeln
es: Cebollas frescas
fi: tuore sipuli, tuoreet sipulit
fr: oignons frais
hr: svježi luk
it: cipolla fresca
nl: verse uien
ru: лук свежий

fr: jus d'oignon concentré, jus concentré d'oignon, jus concentré d'oignons
de: Zwiebelsaftkonzentrat
fi: sipulimehutiiviste
nl: geconcentreerd uiensap
sv: lökjuicekoncentrat

en: dehydrated onion, dried onion
bg: сух лук
ca: ceba deshidratada
cs: cibule sušená
da: tørret løg
de: Zwiebeln getrocknet, Trockenzwiebeln
es: cebolla deshidratada
fi: kuivattu sipuli
fr: oignons déshydratés, oignon déshydraté, oignon séché
hr: dehidrirani luk
hu: szárított hagyma, dehidratált hagyma
it: cipolle disidratate
ja: ドライ玉ねぎ
lv: dehidrēts sīpols
nl: gedroogde uien, gedroogde ui, oignons séchés, oignon déshydraté
nn: tørket løk
pl: suszona cebula, cebula suszona, sproszkowana cebula
pt: cebola desidratada, cebola seca
ro: ceapă deshidratată
ru: лук репчатый сушеный, лук-репчатый сушёный, лук репчатый-сушёный
sv: torkad lök
uk: цибуля ріпчаста сушена